Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-801
Clothing; household goods; services thereon; sale; notice.

Any garment, clothing, wearing apparel, or household goods on which cleaning, pressing, glazing, or washing has been done, upon which alterations or repairs have been made, or on which materials or supplies have been used or furnished, remaining in the possession of a person, firm, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation for a period of ninety days or more, may be sold to pay the reasonable or agreed charges and the costs of notifying the owner or owners. The person, firm, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation to whom such charges are payable and owing shall first notify the owner or owners of the time and place of such sale. Property that is to be placed in storage after any of the services or labors mentioned in this section shall not be affected by the provisions of this section.

Laws 1943, c. 120, § 1, p. 416;

R.S.1943, § 52-801;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 309.